Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.582

Petition by others for enforcement.

(1) Any person who would qualify under this chapter as having standing to obtain judicial review of an agency's failure to enforce an order directed to another person may file a petition for civil enforcement of that order, but the action may not be commenced:

(a) Until at least sixty days after the petitioner has given notice of the alleged violation and of the petitioner's intent to seek civil enforcement to the head of the agency concerned, to the attorney general, and to each person against whom the petitioner seeks civil enforcement;

(b) If the agency has filed and is diligently prosecuting a petition for civil enforcement of the same order against the same person; or

(c) If a petition for review of the same order has been filed and a stay is in effect.

(2) The petition shall name, as respondents, the agency whose order is sought to be enforced and each person against whom the petitioner seeks civil enforcement.

(3) The agency whose order is sought to be enforced may move to dismiss the petition on the grounds that it fails to qualify under this section or that the enforcement would be contrary to the policy of the agency. The court shall grant the motion to dismiss the petition unless the petitioner demonstrates that (a) the petition qualifies under this section and (b) the agency's failure to enforce its order is based on an exercise of discretion that is arbitrary or capricious.

(4) Except to the extent expressly authorized by law, a petition for civil enforcement may not request, and the court may not grant, any monetary payment apart from taxable costs.

[ 1988 c 288 s 519.]